North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-02 Water Commission
61-02-24.1.
Cooperation and participation of political subdivisions.

All political subdivisions, including counties, townships, cities, park districts, and water resource districts may separately or jointly with other political subdivisions, the state of North Dakota through the commission or federal departments or agencies, investigate, plan, and do all things necessary for participating in or undertaking underground or surface water surveys, development, construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of works, dams, and projects for the beneficial utilization and control of water resources, and may enter into contracts with the commission to pay rents, charges, or other payments for the use of works of the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 10; 1983, ch. 676, § 10.

61-02-24.2.
Payments in lieu of real estate taxes.

For land acquired for the Devils Lake project, the state water commission shall make payments in lieu of real estate taxes to the counties in which the property is located in the same manner and according to the same conditions and procedures as provided in chapter 57-02.1 for payments in lieu of real estate taxes by the state game and fish department.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 25, § 7.

61-02-25.
Duties of state agencies acting through interstate compacts or agreements.

Every state officer, department, board, and commission authorized by any law of this state to act upon or to be concerned with any interstate commission involving any interstate compact, or to act upon any foreign commission involving any foreign compact, or with any federal agency or department of the United States, the subject matter of which in any way concerns or involves water conservation, flood control, irrigation, water pollution or contamination, or the exercise of the powers and duties granted to the commission by this chapter, first shall submit to the commission the plans, purposes, and contemplated action and shall receive the approval of the commission therefor before making any agreement, contract, purchase, sale, or lease, for any of said purposes. The commission may give its aid and assistance to any state agency so acting with respect to any interstate compact.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 12; 1939, ch. 256, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 61-0225; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 11.

61-02-26.
Duties of state agencies concerned with intrastate use or disposition of waters.

Every state officer, department, board, and commission authorized by any law of this state to take any action, perform any duties, or make any contract concerning the use or disposition of waters, or water rights, within the state first shall submit to the department of water resources any plans, purposes, and contemplated action with respect to the use or disposition of the waters, and except as provided in this chapter, must receive the consent and approval of the department of water resources before making any agreement, contract, purchase, sale, or lease to carry into execution any works or projects authorized under the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 13; 1939, ch. 256, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 61-0226; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 12; 2021, ch. 488, § 34, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-27.
Proposals with respect to use or disposition of waters to be presented to department of water resources.

All persons, when concerned with any agreement, contract, sale, or purchase, or the construction of any works or project which involves the use and disposition of any water or water rights, shall present to the department of water resources all proposals with respect to the use or disposition of any waters before making any agreement, contract, purchase, sale, or lease regarding the waters.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 14; 1939, ch. 256, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 61-0227; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 13; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2021, ch. 488, § 35, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-28.
Plans, investigations, and surveys concerning use of waters — Special powers of commission.

The commission may make plans, investigations, and surveys concerning the use of any and all waters, either within or without this state, for purposes of establishing, maintaining, operating, controlling, and regulating systems of irrigation, municipal, domestic, industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife works and projects in connection therewith within the state. The commission shall have all necessary powers of purchasing, selling, leasing, and assigning in accordance with chapter 61-04, rights and interests in the use or in the appropriation of waters for which it has filed a declaration of intent pursuant to section 61-02-30, or obtained a conditional water permit for projects or works and shall possess full authority and jurisdiction to exercise and assert actual control over the corpus of all of such waters, and to regulate the diversion thereof subject to rules and methods prescribed by the commission. This power and authority shall include full right to contract and agree with any person, association, agency, or entity concerning water rights held by such person, association, agency, or entity through which the commission may be given full authority and jurisdiction over such water and water rights. In connection therewith the commission may coordinate, subordinate, supplement, and act jointly or subordinately with the United States, and any agency or department thereof, covering or concerning any federal project affecting water use, works, or projects in connection therewith.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 15; 1939, ch. 256, § 15; R.C. 1943, § 61-0228; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 11; 1983, ch. 676, § 14.

61-02-29.
Commission to have full control over unappropriated public waters of state.

The commission shall have full control over all unappropriated public waters of the state, whether above or under the ground, for which it has filed a declaration of intention pursuant to section 61-02-30, to the extent necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 16; 1939, ch. 256, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 61-0229; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 15.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Water Resources and Oil and Gas Development: A Survey of North Dakota Law, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 507 (2011).

61-02-30.
Commission acquiring water rights and administering provisions of chapter — Declaration of intention.

In acquiring the rights and administering the terms of this chapter, the commission may initiate a right to waters of this state by executing a declaration in writing of the intention to store, divert, or control the unappropriated waters of a particular body, stream, basin, or source, designating and describing in general terms the waters claimed, means of appropriation, and location of proposed use, and shall cause the declaration to be filed in the department of water resources. The department shall issue a conditional water permit to the commission consistent with the terms of the declaration of intention, which vests in the commission on the date of the filing of the declaration. The commission also shall file in the department copies of the commission’s plans and specifications involved in completing any project for the appropriation of water which the commission intends to construct. Except as provided by this section, water rights must be acquired by any person, association, firm, corporation, limited liability company, municipality, or state or federal agency, department, or political subdivision in the manner provided by chapter 61-04.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 16; 1939, ch. 256, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 61-0230; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 12; 1983, ch. 676, § 16; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2021, ch. 488, § 36, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-31.
Priority of a water right dates from when. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 38.

61-02-32.
Modification of plans by commission regarding project to appropriate waters — Filing declaration of intention.

If the commission modifies its plans in connection with any proposed project for which the commission filed a declaration of intention to appropriate waters, the commission shall file in the department of water resources a declaration releasing all or part of the waters affected by the declaration.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 16; 1939, ch. 256, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 61-0232; 2021, ch. 488, § 37, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-33.
Commission to file declaration of completion of appropriation with department of water resources.

Upon completing the construction of works and application to beneficial use of the waters described in the declaration provided in section 61-02-30, the commission shall file in the department of water resources a declaration of completion of the appropriation, reciting the matters contained in the original declaration of intention to appropriate and the conditional water permit for the works obtained from the department.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 16; 1939, ch. 256, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 61-0233; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 17; 2021, ch. 488, § 38, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-34.
Declaration of intention to appropriate or release waters or completion of appropriation as evidence.

A certified copy of the record of the commission’s declaration of intention to appropriate waters, or of the release of all or part of said waters, or of the completion of appropriation, shall be received as competent evidence in all courts and shall be deemed prima facie proof of all matters recited therein.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 16; 1939, ch. 256, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 61-0234.

61-02-35.
When right of commission to waters attaches — Continuation of authority and jurisdiction.

The right of the commission to the waters within this state acquired as provided in this chapter for the purposes defined in this chapter shall attach at and from their source and while flowing in the streams, traveling to the means of control, as well as when actually confined by such means. The authority and jurisdiction of the commission shall continue over such waters after they are released for purposes of use and shall continue to such places of use, and the commission, through and by officers and agents under its authority, may continue to exercise control over such waters and may prevent the diversion thereof without permission first obtained. The commission may reclaim and possess all waters furnished or supplied by it seeping or overflowing from the previous place of use.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 17; 1939, ch. 256, § 17; R.C. 1943, § 61-0235; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 18.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Water Resources and Oil and Gas Development: A Survey of North Dakota Law, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 507 (2011).

61-02-36.
Natural streams employed as a means of diversion of water — Adopting methods to determine natural flow.

Wherever natural streams are employed as a means of diversion of water from the place of confinement to the place of use, the commission shall adopt proper methods and means of determining the natural flow of such streams when the amount of such natural flow is insufficient to satisfy or fill the needs of appropriators prior in right.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 18; 1939, ch. 256, § 18; R.C. 1943, § 61-0236.

61-02-37.
Headgates and measuring devices maintained by appropriators of natural streams — Commission adopting rules preventing diversion of water.

All appropriators of the natural flow of natural streams shall maintain headgates and measuring devices at their respective points of diversion for the purpose of enabling the commission or its authorized agents to determine the amount of water being diverted at any time. The commission may adopt and exercise any method or act to prevent the diversion of any waters under its control without permission first obtained.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 18; 1939, ch. 256, § 18; R.C. 1943, § 61-0237; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 19.

61-02-38.
Holder of water right on natural stream may turn control over to commission.

Any holder of a water right on a natural stream may agree with the commission that it shall have control of the diversion of waters due under such right. In such an event, the commission, through its officers and agents, may exercise the same authority over the waters due said appropriator and may cause them to be delivered to the appropriator in the same manner as in case of waters appropriated by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 18; 1939, ch. 256, § 18; R.C. 1943, § 61-0238; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 14.

61-02-39.
Commission may adjust plans and operation of project to obtain financial aid from United States.

For the purpose of obtaining financial aid from the United States, the commission may adjust the plans and operation of any project created under this chapter to conform to the laws and regulations of the federal government and the supervision of any board, bureau, or commission constituted under such authority and may exercise such powers whenever conferred.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 19; 1939, ch. 256, § 19; R.C. 1943, § 61-0239.

61-02-40.
Authority of commission to extend and be applied to natural waters of state.

The authority of the commission conferred by the provisions of this chapter shall extend and be applied to any right to the natural flow of the waters of this state which it may acquire by condemnation, purchase, exchange, appropriation, or agreement.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 20; 1939, ch. 256, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 61-0240.

61-02-41.
Surveys for the diversion of waters.

For the purpose of regulating the diversion of the natural flow of waters, employees of the department of water resources may enter upon the means and place of use of all appropriators for the purpose of making surveys of respective rights and seasonal needs.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 20; 1939, ch. 256, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 61-0241; S.L. 1989, ch. 745, § 2; 2021, ch. 488, § 39, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-42.
Commission to take into consideration decrees of court adjudicating waters of natural stream.

The commission shall take into consideration the decrees of the courts of this state having jurisdiction which purport to adjudicate the waters of any natural stream or its tributaries, and a fair, reasonable, and equitable reconciliation shall be made between the claimants asserting rights under different decrees and between decreed rights and asserted rights of appropriation not adjudicated by any court.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 20; 1939, ch. 256, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 61-0242.

61-02-43.
Commission may hold hearings relating to rights of claimants — Notice — Findings made.

The commission may hold hearings relating to the rights of respective claimants after first giving such notice as it deems appropriate, and it may make findings of the date and quantity of appropriation and use of all claimants, which it shall recognize and observe in diverting the waters which it owns. The commission may police and distribute to the owner of any such recognized appropriation the waters due the owner upon request of such owner and under terms agreed upon.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 20; 1939, ch. 256, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 61-0243.

61-02-44.
Controlling natural flow of stream deemed police power — Water commissioners not to deprive commission.

The commission, when engaged in controlling and diverting the natural flow of any stream under the authority granted by the provisions of this chapter, shall be deemed to be exercising a police power of this state. Water commissioners appointed by any court shall not have any authority or jurisdiction to deprive the commission of any of the waters owned or administered under agreement with respective owners, but the owner of any prior or vested right contending that the commission is not recognizing and respecting such right may resort to a court of law or equity for the purpose of determining whether or not the rights of said claimant have been invaded, and the commission shall observe the terms of any final decree.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 20; 1939, ch. 256, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 61-0244.

61-02-45.
Commission may divert at any place on stream after impounding or acquiring the right of appropriation.

On the commission’s impounding or acquiring the right of appropriation of the waters of any stream, it may divert or authorize the diversion at any point on said stream, or any portion thereof, when the same may be done without injury to any prior appropriator or riparian owner whose rights shall not have been acquired by the commission as provided in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 20; 1939, ch. 256, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 61-0245.

61-02-46.
Commission may issue bonds — Legislative authorization — Payment restricted.

The commission may provide by resolution, at one time or from time to time, for the issuance of state water development revenue bonds for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more of the works authorized by this chapter. The commission may provide for the refunding and refinancing of the bonds from time to time as often as it is advantageous and in the public interest to do so.

If the principal amount of bonds to be issued for any one works pursuant to this chapter will exceed in the aggregate two million dollars, no bonds may be issued to finance that works unless the legislative assembly authorizes the works and declares the works to be in the public interest.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall not be in any way a debt or liability of this state and shall not constitute a loan of the credit of this state or create any debt or debts, liability or liabilities on behalf of this state, or be or constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of this state, but all such bonds shall be payable solely from funds or revenues pledged or available for their payment as authorized in this chapter. The bonds shall not constitute a charge, lien, nor encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the commission, other than funds or revenues pledged for their payment. Each bond shall recite in substance that the bond, including interest thereon, is payable solely from the funds or revenues pledged to the payment thereof, and that the bond does not constitute a debt of this state or of the commission within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limit.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0246; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 15; 1983, ch. 676, § 20; 1995, ch. 588, § 1.

61-02-47.
When bonds to mature — Callable before maturity.

The bonds which may be issued by the commission shall mature at such time or times, either serially or at one time, in not more than forty years from their date, or dates, as may be fixed by the resolution of the commission, but may be made callable before maturity, if so stated in the resolution and on the face of each bond.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0247; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 25; 1983, ch. 676, § 21.

61-02-48.
Commission to determine interest rate, form, denomination, and execution of bonds.

The commission shall determine the rate of interest bonds issued under this chapter shall bear, the time or times of payment of such interest, the form of the bonds, and the manner of executing the bonds, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereon, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without this state. The bonds shall be sold at public sale or private sale and at such price or prices as the commission shall determine.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0248; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 26; 1981, ch. 269, § 24; 1983, ch. 676, § 22; 1995, ch. 588, § 2.

61-02-49.
Officers whose names are on bonds ceasing to be officers before delivery of bonds — Validity of bonds.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons provided for in this chapter shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0249.

61-02-50.
Bonds issued are negotiable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 38.

61-02-51.
How bonds may be secured.

The bonds provided for in this chapter may be secured by works or lands, and the income derived therefrom, and other funds as the commission may pledge, and the funds received from the sale or disposal of water and from the operation, lease, sale, or other disposition of the works, lands, property, and facilities to be acquired out of the proceeds of the bonds and as provided in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0251; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 23; 1995, ch. 588, § 3.

61-02-52.
Commission may provide for registration of bonds.

Provision may be made by the commission for the registration of any of the bonds as provided by chapter 21-03.1.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 61-0252; S.L. 1995, ch. 588, § 4.

61-02-53.
Issuance and sale of bonds — Proceeds from sale — Use.

The bonds authorized under this chapter may be issued and sold from time to time and in amounts determined by the commission. The commission may, subject to the provisions of section 61-02-48, provide for the sale of the bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of the state. The proceeds of the bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of works authorized by this chapter plus costs of issuance, interest during construction, and any reasonably required reserve funds, and shall be paid out in such manner and under such restrictions as the commission may provide.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 61-0253; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 27; 1981, ch. 269, § 25; 1983, ch. 676, § 24; 1995, ch. 588, § 5.

61-02-54.
Resolution providing for issuance of bonds.

Each resolution providing for the issuance of bonds provided for in this chapter shall set forth the purpose or purposes for which the bonds are to be issued, the provisions for the payment of the bonds, and the revenues or other funds pledged to secure the payment of the bonds.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 3; R.C. 1943, § 61-0254; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 25; 1995, ch. 588, § 6.

61-02-55.
Issuance of temporary bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the commission may issue or provide for the issuance of temporary bonds, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the definitive bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. Temporary bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other condition or thing specified and required by this chapter, except that if legislative authorization is required for the issuance of the definitive bonds pursuant to section 61-02-46, the authorization must be received before the temporary bonds may be issued.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 61-0255; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 26; 1995, ch. 588, § 7.

61-02-56.
Bond guaranty or insurance — Method.

Whenever the commission shall find it necessary to insure or guarantee the payment of all or a part of the principal or interest of any series of bonds, it may enter into an agreement to place under trust indenture or agree to deposit in a trust fund moneys now or hereafter appropriated, to guarantee and insure the payment of the interest on and principal of the bonds. From and with moneys thus appropriated, the commission may guarantee or insure, or agree to pay, or pay the interest on and principal of the bonds. The appropriation of such funds, and the use thereof by the commission to guarantee or insure the payment of any of its bonds, shall not be construed to be pledging the credit of the state of North Dakota nor the guaranteeing by the state of any bonds. The commission may also enter into an agreement with a private bond insurer or with a bank or other credit enhancement provider for bond insurance, a guaranty, a letter of credit, or any other credit enhancement that the commission may find to be advantageous or necessary to insure or guarantee the payment of the interest on or the principal of the bonds. The cost of any credit enhancement may be paid with bond proceeds or other funds available for that purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 4; R.C. 1943, § 61-0256; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 27; 1995, ch. 588, § 8.

61-02-57.
Moneys appropriated to pay interest and principal of bonds available as a revolving fund.

Moneys appropriated to enable the commission to guarantee the payment of the interest or principal of its bonds shall be available to the commission as a continuing revolving fund, and moneys so appropriated, and any unexpended balances thereof, including interest on the moneys and unexpended balances, shall not revert to the state general fund at the end of any biennial fiscal period but shall be available for use by the commission to insure and guarantee the payment of, or pay, to the extent provided in this chapter, the interest and principal of its bonds until otherwise required by law.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 21; 1939, ch. 256, § 21; 1941, ch. 300, § 2, subs. 4; R.C. 1943, § 61-0257; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 28; 1995, ch. 588, § 9.

61-02-58.
Lien upon bond proceeds.

All moneys received from bonds of any series issued pursuant to this chapter shall be used solely for the purpose of paying the cost of the works or projects for the construction of which the bonds have been issued, or for the purpose of paying costs of issuance, interest during construction, and establishing any reasonably required reserve funds. There shall be a lien upon such moneys, until so used in favor of the holders of the bonds or the trustee provided for in this chapter in respect to the bonds.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 22; 1939, ch. 256, § 22; 1941, ch. 300, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 61-0258; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 29; 1995, ch. 588, § 10.

61-02-59.
Series of bonds may be secured by trust indenture.

In the discretion of the commission, any series of bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the commission and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 23; 1939, ch. 256, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 61-0259.

61-02-60.
Trust indentures — Where filed — Filing constitutes constructive notice.

Each trust indenture, or an executed counterpart thereof, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. The filing of a trust indenture, or an executed counterpart thereof, in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property covered by said trust indenture is located shall constitute constructive notice of the contents thereof to all persons from the time of such filing, and no recording of such trust indenture or the contents thereof shall be necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 23; 1939, ch. 256, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 61-0260; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

61-02-61.
Resolution or indenture may contain provisions protecting bondholders — Expenses incurred in carrying out indenture.

Either the resolution providing for the issuance of bonds or the trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper. No enumeration of particular powers granted may be construed to impair any general grant of power contained in this chapter. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the resolution or trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the works affected by the resolution or trust indenture.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 23; 1939, ch. 256, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 61-0261; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 30; 1985, ch. 82, § 154; 1995, ch. 588, § 11.

61-02-62.
Powers of commission in issuance of bonds.

In connection with the issuance of any bonds for the purpose of paying in whole or in part, or as supplemented by a grant from the United States or any instrumentality or agency thereof, the cost of any works or project, or in order to secure the payment of the bonds, the commission may:

Pledge all or any part of the income, profit, and revenue of the works or project, and all moneys received from the sale or disposal of water, use of water, water storage, or other service, and from the operation, lease, sale, or other disposition of all or any part of the works or project, or other funds as the commission may determine.

Covenant against pledging all or any part of the income, profit, and revenue of the works or project and all moneys received from the sale or disposal of water, use of water, water storage, or other service, and from the operation, lease, sale, or other disposition of all or any part of the works or project.

Covenant against mortgaging all or any part of the works or project or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon.

Covenant to fix and establish such prices, rates, and charges for water and other services made available in connection with the works or project as to provide at all times funds together with other funds the commission may pledge which will be sufficient:

To pay all costs of operation and maintenance of the works or project, as permitted under this chapter, together with necessary repairs thereto;

To meet and pay the principal and interest of all the bonds as they severally become due and payable; and

To create such reserves for the principal and interest of all the bonds and for the meeting of contingencies in the operation, repair, replacement, and maintenance of the works or project as the commission shall determine.

Make such further covenants as to prices, rates, and charges as the commission shall determine.

Create special funds, in addition to those required by this chapter, for the meeting of contingencies in the operation and maintenance of the works or project and to determine the manner in which, and the depository or depositories in which, the funds shall be deposited and the manner in which the same shall be secured. Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state may act as the depository and shall furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the commission on all deposits exceeding the sum of five thousand dollars.

Provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds.

Covenant against extending the time for the payment of the principal or interest on any bonds, directly or indirectly, by any means or in any manner.

Prescribe and covenant as to the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds shall become, or may be declared, due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which a declaration and its consequences may be waived.

Covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation.

Vest in a trustee or trustees the right to enforce any covenant made to secure or to pay the bonds, or to foreclose any trust indenture in relation thereto, provide for the powers and duties of the trustee, or trustees, and limit the liabilities thereof, and provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any covenant or exercise the right of foreclosure.

Make covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of the commission, to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated or expressly authorized in this chapter.

Do all things in the issuance of the bonds, and in providing for their security, that may not be inconsistent with the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 23; 1939, ch. 256, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 61-0262; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 31; 1995, ch. 588, § 12; 2017, ch. 419, § 9, effective August 1, 2017.

61-02-63.
Mortgage of commission — Contents — Purchaser at foreclosure sale — Rights.

Any purchaser at any sale of any works or project pursuant to a judgment or decree in an action to foreclose a trust indenture conveying in trust or mortgaging any works or project financed with bonds issued by the commission as authorized by this chapter shall obtain title to the works or project free from any trust or other obligation of the commission, the state of North Dakota, or the public thereof, as to its operation, maintenance, use, or disposition except the obligation to use all water impounded in the works or project for sale, rental distribution, or other beneficial use.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 24; 1939, ch. 256, § 24; R.C. 1943, § 61-0263; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 32; 1995, ch. 588, § 13.

61-02-64.
Fund created by commission — Depository.

The commission shall have a fund to be known as the “contract fund”. The moneys in the contract fund shall be deposited in the state treasury. The contract fund shall have such accounts as the commission may determine. The use or disposition of such accounts, including the pledging thereof for the security of and payment on one or more series of bonds, shall be determined by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 25; 1939, ch. 256, § 25; R.C. 1943, § 61-0264; S.L. 1965, ch. 447, § 3; 1983, ch. 676, § 33; 1995, ch. 588, § 14.

61-02-64.1.
Contract fund — Purpose — Reimbursements to be deposited with the state treasurer.

Unless otherwise provided under the terms of a bond resolution or trust indenture adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter, all contractual obligations of the commission, excepting salaries and expenses of commission employees and the cost of any office supplies, materials, and equipment, must be paid from the contract fund. The moneys in the contract fund must be paid out or disbursed in the manner determined by the commission. Any moneys paid to the commission by any department, agency, or political subdivision of this or another state or of the United States or any person, corporation, or limited liability company to meet its part of the cost of a water project, shared with the commission on a matching basis, and as determined by a contract entered into with the commission, must be held pursuant to the terms of the resolution or trust indenture adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter or deposited with the state treasurer. Moneys deposited with the state treasurer are appropriated to the commission and must be credited to the contract fund.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 377, § 1; 1965, ch. 447, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 588, § 15; 1997, ch. 514, § 1; 1997, ch. 515, § 1.

61-02-64.2.
Repayment of loan proceeds and reimbursements deposited in resources trust fund.

Notwithstanding section 61-02-64.1, any repayment made after January 1, 1991, of any loans disbursed from the contract fund or resources trust fund and any moneys paid to the state or the commission after January 1, 1991, to reimburse the commission for moneys, other than bond proceeds, used for municipal, rural, and industrial water supply projects must be deposited in the resources trust fund in the state treasury.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 44, § 7; 1997, ch. 515, § 2.

61-02-65.
Commission to have complete system of accounting — Contents.

The commission shall have a complete system of accounting to show the total expenditure of and investment in each project and the total revenue derived therefrom and shall prepare periodic reports giving the financial statement of each project and the status of all projects together.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 25; 1939, ch. 256, § 25; R.C. 1943, § 61-0265.

Cross-References.

Reports by state commissions, see N.D.C.C. §§ 54-06-03 to 54-06-04.3.

61-02-66.
Construction fund — Contents — Disbursements — Surplus remaining. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 588, § 18.

61-02-67.
Revenue bond payment fund — Contents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 588, § 18.

61-02-67.1.
Revenues and funds available to pay bonds.

Bonds issued under this chapter are payable solely from:

Revenues to be received by the commission from the operation of a works financed with the bonds.

Any other revenues available to the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 588, § 16.

61-02-68.
State treasurer to pay interest on bonds — Redemption of bonds — Appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 588, § 18.

61-02-68.1.
Borrowing on interim notes — Expenses paid and loans made from proceeds — Issuance of notes.

The commission, pursuant to appropriate resolution, and in order to carry out the business of developing the water resources of this state as provided in this chapter, may borrow money and issue interim financing notes (the terms “interim notes” or “notes”, unless the context otherwise requires, may be used in sections 61-02-68.1 through 61-02-68.19 in lieu of the term “interim financing notes”) in evidence thereof in order to provide owners with construction period financing. The construction period financing may include the costs of construction of works or projects, funding of debt service reserves and capitalized interest, and the payment of the costs of issuance.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 1; 1999, ch. 536, § 1.

61-02-68.2.
Interim financing notes guaranteed by United States agency or instrumentality — Limitations.

In addition to its other powers, the commission may enter into interim financing and loan agreements with any owner or owners to loan the proceeds of the commission’s interim financing notes to any owner or owners for works or projects authorized by this chapter anywhere within this state and to adopt the necessary resolution therefor, without regard to the limitations, provisions, or requirements of any other law, except those of this chapter. Before any such agreement can be entered into, an agency or instrumentality of the United States government, including the farmers home administration or the old west regional commission, or any agency of this state, including the Bank of North Dakota, must have committed itself to make a grant or loan to such owner or owners. Under this section, the commission may only provide interim financing less than or equal to the federal or state grant or loan commitment on each project and may not apply the proceeds of such notes and financing to any purpose other than expenses allowed by section 61-02-68.1 and the project or works for which the loan agreement is made. Notes authorized by sections 61-02-68.1 through 61-02-68.13 shall not be considered revenue bonds under section 61-02-46, and the proceeds of any such notes shall not be part of any commission fund as enumerated in section 61-02-64, and need not be deposited in the state treasury.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 2.